Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2554.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The legislature finds that chapter 77.110 RCW is inconsistent with judicially affirmed and treaty-reserved fishing rights. The legislature also finds that chapter 77.110 RCW conflicts with well-established state-tribal cooperative fishery management agreements. Therefore, the legislature acknowledges that in order to keep its commitments and relationship with Pacific Northwest tribes and to avoid any legal confusion with current cooperative agreements, it is necessary to repeal chapter 77.110 RCW.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:(1) RCW 77.110.010 (Declaration) and 1985 c 1 s 1;(2) RCW 77.110.020 (Petition to congress) and 1985 c 1 s 2;(3) RCW 77.110.030 (Management of natural resourcesâState policy) and 1985 c 1 s 3;(4) RCW 77.110.040 (DeclarationâDenial of rights based on race, sex, origin, or cultural heritage) and 1985 c 1 s 4; and(5) RCW 77.110.900 (Transmittal of act to president and congressâ1985 c 1) and 1985 c 1 s 5.--- END ---